Wyoming statutes. Title 2 Wills, Decedents' Estates and Probate Code
Article 2. Wrongful Death

Editor's notes. —

Laws 1982, ch. 54, §§ 2 through 8, read:

“Section 2. The Wyoming Legislature finds the title to the 1981 Senate File 88 which attempted to repeal the wrongful death statutes was inaccurate and misleading in that it said the wrongful death statutes duplicated statutes which were no longer in existence, which statement was not true; the action repealing those statutes was in reliance upon the accuracy of the statement that there were duplicate statutes found in other places in the statutes, and therefore, the Wyoming Legislature by this act hereby declares the attempted repeal of W.S.

2-14-201

and 2-14-202 by Chapter 151, Session Laws of Wyoming 1981, void.

“Section 3. W.S.

1-38-101

and

1-38-102

are effective retroactively to the time when Chapter 151, Session Laws of Wyoming 1981 became effective.

“Section 4. At the time Chapter 151 was enacted in 1981, it was the belief of the Wyoming Legislature that W.S.

1-38-101

and

1-38-102

were in full force and effect, and that W.S.

2-14-201

and 2-14-202 were duplicative and therefore superfluous statutes and those facts were recited in the title to Original Senate File 88, which became Chapter 151, Session Laws of Wyoming 1981.

“Section 5. The legislature declares that its sole purpose in enacting Chapter 151, Session Laws of Wyoming 1981, was to delete statutes relating to wrongful death that were erroneously believed to be duplicative.

“Section 6. The legislature further declares that its purpose in that repeal was not to eliminate or affect in any way causes of action for wrongful death.

“Section 7. Should a determination be reached that the inadvertent attempted repeal was legally effective, this retroactive application is intended to cure that inadvertent and unintentional repeal of W.S.

2-14-201

and 2-14-202 and to retroactively reinstate such sections, renumbered as W.S.

1-38-101

and

1-38-102

.

“Section 8. This act is effective upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 9, 1982.”

§§ 2-14-201 and 2-14-202.
[Renumbered.]

Renumbered as §§

1-38-101

and

1-38-102

by Laws 1982, ch. 54, § 7.

Editor's notes. —

See editor's note following article heading above.